California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The California Massage Therapy Council, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 4601, is hereby established and shall carry out the responsibilities and duties set forth in this chapter.

(b) (1) The council may take any reasonable actions necessary to carry out the responsibilities and duties set forth in this chapter, including, but not limited to, hiring staff, entering into contracts, and developing policies, procedures, rules, and bylaws to implement this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the total annual salary for any individual employed or contracted by the council shall not exceed the annual salary provided pursuant to Section 11550 of the Government Code
 during that fiscal year. 

(c) The council may require background checks for all employees, contractors, volunteers, and board members as a condition of their employment, formation of a contractual relationship, or participation in council activities.

(d) The council shall issue a certificate to an individual applicant who satisfies the requirements of this chapter for that certificate.

(e) The council is authorized to determine whether the information provided to the council in relation to the certification of an applicant is true and correct and meets the requirements of this chapter. If the council has any reason to question whether the information provided is true or correct, or meets the requirements of this chapter, the council is authorized to make any investigation it deems necessary to establish that the
 information received is accurate and satisfies any criteria established by this chapter. The applicant has the burden to prove that they are entitled to certification.

(f) The council shall be governed by a board of directors composed of 13 members who shall be chosen in the following manner:

(1) One member shall be a representative of the League of California Cities, unless that entity chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(2) One member shall be a representative of the California Police Chiefs Association, unless that entity chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(3) One member shall be a representative of the California State Association of Counties, unless that entity chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(4) One member shall be a representative of an “anti-human trafficking” organization to be determined by the council. This organization shall appoint one member, unless the organization chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(5) One member shall be a member of the public appointed by the Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs, unless the director chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(6) One member who represents an approved massage school shall be appointed by the California Association of Private Postsecondary Schools, unless that entity chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(7) One member shall be appointed by the American Massage Therapy Association, California Chapter, who shall be a California-certified massage
 therapist or massage practitioner who is a California resident and who has been practicing massage for at least three years, unless that entity chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(8) One member shall be a public health official representing a city, county, city and county, or state health department, to be determined by the council. The city, county, city and county, or state health department chosen, shall appoint one member unless that entity chooses not to exercise this right to appoint.

(9) (A) Two members shall each be a certified massage therapist or a certified massage practitioner who is a California resident who has practiced massage for at least three years prior to the appointment, selected by a professional society, association, or other entity the membership of which is composed of massage therapist professionals, and that chooses to
 participate in the council. To qualify, a professional society, association, or other entity shall have a dues-paying membership in California of at least 1,000 individuals, have been established since 2000, and shall have bylaws that require its members to comply with a code of ethics.

(B) If there are more than two professional societies, associations, or other entities that meet the requirements of subparagraph (A), the appointments shall rotate based on a four-year term between each of the qualifying entities. The qualifying entity shall maintain its appointment authority during the entirety of the four-year term during which it holds the appointment authority. The order in which a qualifying professional society, association, or other entity has the authority to appoint shall be determined by alphabetical order based on the full legal name of the entity as of January 1, 2014.

(10) The members appointed to the board in accordance with paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, shall appoint three additional members, at a duly held board meeting in accordance with the board’s bylaws. One of those appointees shall be an attorney licensed by the State Bar of California who has been practicing law for at least three years and who at the time of appointment represents a city, county, or a city and county in the state. One of those appointees shall represent a massage business entity that has been operating in the state for at least three years. The council shall establish in its bylaws a process for appointing an additional member, provided that the member has knowledge of the massage industry or can bring needed expertise to the operation of the council for purposes of complying with Section 4603.

(g) Any decision to change the appointing authority of any member appointed to the board pursuant to paragraphs (1) to
 (9), inclusive, of subdivision (f) shall not be effective unless the current member has completed their term under subdivision (h) or the appointment is vacant.

(h) (1) Board member terms shall be for four years and until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until one year from the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever occurs first. A board member who has served two terms shall not be eligible for reappointment to the board regardless of the appointing authority. Any board member who, as of January 1, 2025, has served on the board for 8 out of the preceding 10 years, regardless of the appointing authority, shall vacate their appointment no later than July 1, 2025.

(2) A board member may be removed only by their appointing authority under the conditions provided in Section 106.

(i) The board of directors shall establish fees reasonably related to the cost of providing services and carrying out its ongoing responsibilities and duties. Initial and renewal fees for certificates shall be in an amount sufficient to support the functions of the council in the administration of this chapter, but in no event shall exceed three hundred dollars ($300). The renewal fee shall be reassessed biennially by the board.

(j) Prior to holding a meeting to vote upon a proposal to increase the certification fees, the board shall provide at least 90 days’ notice of the meeting, including posting a notice on the council’s internet website unless at least two-thirds of the board members concur that there is an active threat to public safety and that voting at a meeting without prior notice is necessary. However, the board shall not waive the requirements of subdivision
 (l).

(k) If the board approves an increase in the certification fees, the council shall update all relevant areas of its internet website and notify all certificate holders and affected applicants by email within 14 days of the board’s action.

(l) The meetings of the council shall be subject to the rules of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The board may adopt additional policies and procedures that provide greater transparency to certificate holders and the public than required by the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, meetings of the council shall be governed by either Rosenberg’s Rules of Order or Robert’s Rules of Order, Newly Revised. 

(m) (1) The council shall provide a meaningful opportunity for public participation in the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws that substantially impact the rights, benefits, privileges, duties, obligations, or responsibilities of individuals or entities subject to certification or approval by the council, including, but not limited to, actions by the council to increase fees, impose additional requirements for certification or approval, or substantively modify the disciplinary processes.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the council shall, at a minimum, publish the complete text of any policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws proposed for adoption, amendment, or repeal along with a summary of the changes being considered for a period of at least 45 calendar days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal. The council shall
 accept written public comments during the 45-day period and allow further public comment during a meeting held for these purposes.

(n) The council shall assess its contact with non-English speakers. Based on this assessment, the council shall offer and make available all publicly available written and electronic materials provided to certificate holders and applicants in languages other than English that the council determines will be used by a substantial number of non-English speakers who are in contact with the council. This subdivision shall not apply to examinations, denial and disciplinary legal documents, and email communications. The council shall provide a report to the Legislature on the findings of its assessment of contact with non-English speakers on or before January 1, 2019.

(o) (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, the council shall, to the extent
 practicable, make the records of the council available for public inspection in a manner consistent with the California Public Records Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Part 1 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code), as though the council were a public agency for purposes of that act.

(2) The council may charge for the direct costs of responding to requests for records pursuant to this subdivision, including staff time reasonably required to identify, locate, and provide records.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision that, in addition to having all exemptions under the California Public Records Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Part 1 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code) apply, the council shall not disclose investigatory records or records containing sensitive information, including law
 enforcement activities or personally identifying information regarding applicants, certificate holders, employers of certificate holders or other employer staff, council employees and contractors, massage school owners and staff, or other members of the public, including potential victims or survivors of human trafficking, sexual assault, or other crimes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the council in exercising its certification and disciplinary authority, and any other functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.1.

Local governments shall impose and enforce only reasonable and necessary fees and regulations on massage businesses and massage establishments, in keeping with the requirements of existing law and being mindful of the need to protect legitimate business owners and massage professionals, particularly sole providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.   (AB 2194)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.

(a) In order to obtain certification as a massage therapist, an applicant shall submit a written application and provide the council with satisfactory evidence that the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The applicant is 18 years of age or older.

(2) The applicant has successfully completed the curricula in massage and related subjects totaling a minimum of 500 hours, or the credit unit equivalent, that incorporates appropriate school assessment of student knowledge and skills.

(A) Of the 500 hours, a minimum of 100 hours of instruction shall address anatomy and physiology, contraindications, health and hygiene, and
 business and ethics.

(B) All of the 500 hours shall be from approved schools. The council shall accept the 500 hours if, at the time all of the hours were completed, the school or schools were approved. The 500 hours may be completed at more than one approved school. Notwithstanding any other law, pursuant to its policies and procedures for approval of schools, the council shall accept hours earned by an applicant for certification as a massage therapist if those hours were completed before July 1, 2016, and were earned from a school providing education in this state that was unapproved by the council after July 1, 2016, based solely on the fact that the National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage and Bodywork took denial or disciplinary action against the school. For purposes of this section, “unapproved” means that the council determined that it will not accept hours from a school toward certification.

(C) (i) Any applicant who meets all of the other requirements for certification and who received instruction required by this paragraph at an approved school that was not under formal investigation at the time at which the applicant began instruction but was subsequently placed under investigation by the council shall, as a condition of certification, have the opportunity for an interview pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4615 or an educational hearing determined by the council, provided that their application for certification was submitted to the council no more than 90 days from the date of a final decision by the council to revoke the school’s approval. Any interview or education hearing provided pursuant to this clause shall be completed no later than 12 months from the date that the council deems the application packet complete.

(ii) The council shall
 issue a certificate to any applicant who successfully passes the interview or education hearing described in clause (i), provided that the school at which the applicant completed the instruction was a school approved by the council within 90 days from the date an applicant submitted their application for certification and was considered to be in good standing according to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at the time the applicant passed the interview or hearing.

(3) (A) The applicant has passed a massage and bodywork competency assessment examination that meets generally recognized psychometric principles and standards and that is approved by the council. The successful completion of this examination may have been accomplished before the date the council is authorized by this chapter to begin issuing certificates. This subparagraph shall be inoperative commencing on January 1, 2019.

(B) Beginning January 1, 2026, an approved massage school shall, upon each student’s completion of curriculum at the massage school, provide notice to the student that the massage and bodywork competency assessment examination described in subparagraph (A) is not a requirement for certification pursuant to this chapter but may be required for licensure or certification as a massage therapist in any other state.

(4) The applicant has successfully passed a background investigation pursuant to Section 4606, and has not violated any of the provisions of this chapter.

(5) All fees required by the council have been paid.

(6) The council may issue a certificate to an applicant who meets the qualifications of this chapter if the applicant holds a current and valid
 registration, certification, or license from any other state whose licensure requirements meet or exceed those defined within this chapter. If an applicant has received education at a school that is not approved by the council, the council shall have the discretion to give credit for comparable academic work completed by an applicant in a program outside of California.

(7) If an applicant has received education at a school located outside of California or a school located in a country outside of the United States that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 4601 to be an approved school, the council shall have the discretion to give credit for comparable academic work completed by an applicant toward certification.

(b) A certificate issued pursuant to this chapter and any identification card issued by the council shall be surrendered to the council by any
 certificate holder whose certificate is suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.1.

(a) The council shall not accept applications to issue any new certificates to practice as a certified massage practitioner on or after January 1, 2015.

(b) Certificates to practice as a certified massage practitioner for applications accepted prior to January 1, 2015, may be renewed without any additional educational requirements.

(c) A massage practitioner certificate and any identification card issued by the council, shall be surrendered to the council by any certificate holder whose certificate is suspended or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.2.

(a) A person who was issued a conditional certificate to practice as a massage practitioner shall, within five years of being issued the conditional certificate by the council, complete and report to the council the completion of, at least 30 hours of additional education per year from approved schools or from continuing education providers approved by the council, until he or she has completed a total of at least 250 hours of education.

(b) A conditional certificate issued to any person pursuant to this section shall immediately be nullified, without need for further action by the council, if proof of completion of the requirements specified in subdivision (a) is not
 filed with the council within the time period specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4604.1, the council shall issue a new certificate to practice as a massage practitioner to a person that successfully completes the requirements described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4605.

Except as otherwise provided, a certification issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to renewal every two years in the manner prescribed by the council. A certificate issued by the council shall expire after two years unless renewed as prescribed. The council may provide for the late renewal of a certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4606.

(a) Prior to issuing a certificate to an applicant, the council shall require the applicant to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.

(b) The council shall submit the fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The council shall request subsequent arrest notification service from the Department of Justice, as provided under
 Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for all applicants for certification for
 whom fingerprint images and related information are submitted to conduct a search for state-level criminal offender record information.

(e) The council is authorized to receive arrest notifications and other background materials about applicants and certificate holders from a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4607.

The council may discipline an owner or operator of a massage business or establishment who is certified pursuant to this chapter or is an applicant for certification pursuant to this chapter for the conduct of all individuals providing massage for compensation on the business premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 411, Sec. 5.   (AB 2194)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4608.

In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, a certificate holder shall:

(a) Display their original certificate wherever they provide massage for compensation. A certificate holder shall have their identification card in their possession while providing massage services for compensation.

(b) Provide their full name and certificate number upon the request of a member of the public, the council, or a member of law enforcement, or a local government agency charged with regulating massage or massage establishments, at the location where they are providing massage services for compensation.

(c) Include the name under which they are certified and their
 certificate number in any and all advertising of massage for compensation.

(d) Notify the council within 30 days of any changes in the certificate holder’s legal name, home address, or the address of any massage establishment or other location where they provide massage for compensation, excluding those locations where massage is only provided on an out-call basis. A certificate holder also shall notify the council of their primary email address, if any, and notify the council within 30 days of a change of the primary email address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 4.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4609.

(a) It is a violation of this chapter for an applicant or a certificate holder to commit any of the following acts, the commission of which is grounds for the council to deny an application for a certificate or to impose discipline on a certificate holder:

(1) Unprofessional conduct, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Engaging in sexually suggestive advertising related to massage services.

(B) Engaging in any form of sexual activity on the premises of a massage establishment where massage is provided for compensation, excluding a residence.

(C) Engaging
 in sexual activity while providing massage services for compensation.

(D) Practicing massage on a suspended certificate or practicing outside of the conditions of a restricted certificate.

(E) Providing massage of the genitals or anal region.

(F) Providing massage of female breasts without the written consent of the person receiving the massage.

(2) Procuring or attempting to procure a certificate by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.

(3) Failing to fully disclose all information requested on the application.

(4) Impersonating an applicant or acting as a proxy for an applicant in any examination referred to in this chapter
 for the issuance of a certificate.

(5) Impersonating a certificate holder, or permitting or allowing a noncertified person to use a certificate.

(6) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter or any rule or bylaw adopted by the council.

(7) Committing any fraudulent, dishonest, or corrupt act that is substantially related to the qualifications or duties of a certificate holder.

(8) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, citation, or any other disciplinary action against an applicant or certificate holder by another state or territory of the United States, by any other government agency, or by another California health
 care professional licensing board. A certified copy of the decision, order, judgment, or citation shall be conclusive evidence of these actions.

(9) (A) Being convicted of any felony, misdemeanor, infraction, or municipal code violation, or being held liable in an administrative or civil action for an act, that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a certificate holder. A record of the conviction or other judgment or liability shall be conclusive evidence of the crime or liability.

(B) The council may take action pursuant to this paragraph when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “conviction” means
 a judgment following a plea or verdict of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, or a finding of guilt.

(10) Dressing while engaged in the practice of massage for compensation, or while visible to clients in a massage establishment, in a manner that is deemed by the council to constitute unprofessional attire based on the custom and practice of the profession in California.

(11) Committing any act punishable as a sexually related crime or being required to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code), or being required to register as a sex offender in another state.

(12) Being determined to be a threat to public safety based on mental health reasons by a medical or mental health professional, or rendered a finding of not guilty
 in a criminal proceeding by reason of insanity.

(b) The council may deny an application for a certificate for the commission of any of the acts described in subdivision (a). The council may also discipline a certificate holder, in any manner permitted by this chapter, for the commission of any of those acts by a certificate holder.

(c) The council shall deny an application for a certificate, or revoke the certificate of a certificate holder, if the applicant or certificate holder is required to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code), or is required to register as a sex offender in another state.

(d) Denial of an initial certificate on the grounds that the applicant has been convicted of a crime or has been subject to
 formal discipline as provided in this section shall be consistent with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 5.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4610.

(a) An applicant for a certificate shall not be denied a certificate, and a certificate holder shall not be disciplined pursuant to this chapter except according to procedures that satisfy the requirements of this section. Denial or discipline that is not in accord with this section shall be void and without effect.

(b) The council may discipline a certificate holder by any, or a combination, of the following methods:

(1) Placing the certificate holder on probation, which may include limitations or conditions on practice.

(2) Suspending the certificate and the rights conferred by this chapter on a certificate holder for a period not to
 exceed one year.

(3) Suspending or staying the disciplinary order, or portions of it, with or without conditions.

(4) Revoking the certificate.

(5) Taking other action as the council deems proper, as authorized by this chapter or policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws adopted by the board.

(c) The council may issue an initial certificate on probation, with specific terms and conditions, to any applicant.

(d) Any denial or discipline shall be decided upon and imposed in good faith and in a fair and reasonable manner. Any procedure that conforms to the requirements of subdivision (e) is fair and reasonable.

(e) A procedure is
 fair and reasonable and meets requirements for fair procedure if the procedures specified in subdivision (f) or (g) are followed or if all of the following apply:

(1) Denial or discipline shall be based on a preponderance of the evidence. In determining the basis for the denial or discipline and making a final decision that denial or discipline shall be imposed, the council may consider all written documents or statements as evidence, but shall weigh the reliability of those documents or statements. A final decision to deny or impose discipline may be based solely on a written statement or declaration made under penalty of perjury and the individual providing the written statement or declaration made under penalty of perjury shall not be required to appear at an oral hearing or provide additional documents or information beyond the written statement or declaration made under penalty of perjury that was already provided.

(2) The provisions of the procedure are publicly available on the council’s internet website.

(3) The council provides 15 calendar days prior notice of the denial or discipline and the reasons for the denial or discipline.

(4) The council provides an opportunity for the applicant or certificate holder, to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the denial or discipline, by a qualified person or body authorized to decide whether the proposed denial or discipline should go into effect.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the council receives notice that a certificate holder has been arrested and charges have been filed by the appropriate prosecuting agency against the certificate holder
 alleging a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 647 of the Penal Code or any other offense described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 4609, the council shall immediately suspend, on an interim basis, the certificate of that certificate holder, and take all of the following additional actions:

(A) Notify the certificate holder at the address last filed with the council that the certificate has been suspended and the reason for the suspension within 10 business days.

(B) Provide notification of the suspension by email to the clerk or other designated contact of the city, county, or city and county in which the certificate holder lives or works, pursuant to the council’s records, within 10 business days.

(C) Provide notification of the suspension by email or first-class mail to any establishment or
 employer, whether public or private, that the council has in its records as employing the certificate holder, within 10 business days.

(2) Upon notice to the council that the charges described in paragraph (1) have resulted in a conviction, the council shall permanently revoke the suspended certificate. The council shall provide notice to the certificate holder, at the address last filed with the council by a method providing delivery confirmation, within 10 business days that it has evidence of a valid record of conviction and that the certificate will be revoked unless the certificate holder provides evidence within 15 days from the date of the council’s mailing of the notice that the conviction is either invalid or that the information is otherwise erroneous.

(3) Upon notice that the charges described in paragraph (1) have resulted in an acquittal or have been otherwise
 dismissed prior to conviction, the certificate shall be immediately reinstated and the certificate holder and any establishment or employer that received notice pursuant to this section shall be notified of the reinstatement within 10 business days.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the council determines that a certificate holder has committed an act punishable as a sexually related crime or a felony that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a certificate holder, the council may immediately suspend the certificate of that certificate holder. A determination to immediately suspend a certificate pursuant to this subdivision shall be based upon a preponderance of the evidence and the council shall also consider any available credible mitigating evidence before making a decision. Written statements by any person shall not be considered by the council when determining whether to
 immediately suspend a certificate unless made under penalty of perjury. If the council suspends a certificate in accordance with this subdivision, the council shall take all of the following additional actions:

(A) Notify the certificate holder within 10 business days, at the address last filed with the council, by a method providing delivery confirmation, that the certificate has been suspended, the reason for the suspension, and that the certificate holder has the right to request a hearing pursuant to paragraph (2).

(B) Notify by email or any other means consistent with the notice requirements of this chapter, any business or employer, whether public or private, that the council has in its records as employing or contracting with the certificate holder for massage services, and the California city, county, or city and county that has jurisdiction over that establishment or
 employer, that the certificate has been suspended within 10 business days.

(2) A certificate holder whose certificate is suspended pursuant to this subdivision shall have the right to request, in writing, an oral hearing or consideration of a written statement to challenge the factual basis for the suspension. If the holder of the suspended certificate requests an oral hearing or consideration of a written statement on the suspension, the oral hearing or consideration of a written statement shall be held within 30 calendar days after receipt of the request. A holder whose certificate is suspended based on paragraph (1) shall be subject to revocation or other discipline in accordance with subdivision (a).

(3) If the council determines, after a hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision, to lift the suspension, the certificate shall be immediately reinstated and the certificate
 holder, any establishment or employer, and the city, county, or city and county that has jurisdiction over that establishment or employer, that received notice pursuant to this section shall be notified of the reinstatement within 10 business days.

(h) Any notice required under this section may be given by any method reasonably calculated to provide actual notice. Any notice given by mail shall be given by first-class or certified mail sent to the last address of the applicant or certificate holder shown on the council’s records.

(i) An applicant or certificate holder may challenge a denial or discipline decision issued pursuant to this section in a court of competent jurisdiction. Any action challenging a denial or discipline, including any claim alleging defective notice, shall be commenced within 90 days after the effective date of the denial or discipline. Certification issued
 pursuant to this chapter is not a fundamental vested right and judicial review of denial and disciplinary decisions made by the council shall be conducted using the substantial evidence standard of review. If the action is successful, the court may order any relief, including reinstatement, that it finds equitable under the circumstances.

(j) (1) An applicant or certificate holder may request an appeal of a final decision by the council to deny a certificate or discipline a certificate holder by submitting a request in writing within 30 days of the date of the final decision. A request to appeal a final decision submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall be considered by a committee of the board of directors, who may convene in closed session for that purpose, within 120 days of the final decision.

(2) If a request to appeal submitted pursuant to paragraph
 (1) is granted, the appeal of the final decision to deny a certificate or discipline a certificate holder shall be heard at the next board of directors meeting with a date, as posted on the internet website of the council, that is at least 120 days from the date that the request to appeal was granted, unless a timely request for a continuance of the hearing date is granted. The council may, in its discretion, for good cause, continue the date an appeal may be heard, in which case the appeal shall be heard at a later board of directors meeting.

(3) The council shall notify the applicant or certificate holder of its right to request an appeal pursuant to paragraph (1) at the time of the final decision.

(k) This section governs only the procedures for denial or discipline decision and not the substantive grounds for the denial or discipline. Denial or discipline based upon
 substantive grounds that violates contractual or other rights of the applicant or certificate holder, or is otherwise unlawful, is not made valid by compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 6.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4611.

(a) It is an unfair business practice for a person to do any of the following:

(1) To hold himself or herself out or to use the title of “certified massage therapist” or “certified massage practitioner,” or any other term, such as “licensed,” “certified,” “CMT,” or “CMP,” in any manner whatsoever that implies or suggests that the person is certified as a massage therapist or massage practitioner, unless that person currently holds an active and valid certificate issued by the council pursuant to this chapter.

(2) To falsely state or advertise or put out any sign or card or other device, or to falsely
 represent to the public through any print or electronic media, that he or she or any other individual is licensed, certified, or registered by a governmental agency as a massage therapist or massage practitioner.

(b) In addition to any other available remedies, engaging in any of the prohibited behaviors described in subdivision (a) constitutes unfair competition under Section 17200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4612.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a city, county, or city and county shall not enact or enforce an ordinance that conflicts with this chapter or Section 51034 of the Government Code.
